Hawaii statutes.
§501-7 Registrar; powers, duties. The
registrar shall be under the direction of the court, and shall have the custody
and control of all papers and documents filed with the registrar under this
chapter, and shall carefully number and index the same. The papers and
documents shall be kept in Honolulu in an office to be called the land
registration office, which shall be near the land court. The registrar may,
with the sanction of the court, employ such clerks and messengers as are
necessary. [L 1903, c 56, §8; am L 1913, c 21, §1; RL 1925, §3197; RL 1935,
§5006; RL 1945, §12606; RL 1955, §342-7; HRS §501-7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next